Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2309
License; suspension; revocation; grounds; hearing; notice.

The board of examiners may suspend or revoke any license issued under the County Highway and City Street Superintendents Act for fraud or deceit in obtaining it, neglect of duty, or incompetence in the performance of duty. Such action shall only be taken after notice and hearing under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 9, p. 668;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.